Illinois, session 104th, HB1123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital District Law is amended by 5changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 910/14)  (from Ch. 23, par. 1264)7    Sec. 14. The board of directors of a District shall 8possess and exercise all of its legislative and executive 9powers. Within thirty days after the appointment of the 10initial directors, the board shall meet. The time and place of 11the first meeting of the board shall be designated by the 12circuit court. At its first meeting the board shall elect a 13chairman from its members and select a secretary, treasurer 14and such officers or employees as it deems expedient or 15necessary for the accomplishment of its corporate objects. The 16secretary and treasurer need not be members of the Board. At 17the meeting the board, by ordinance, shall define the first 18and subsequent fiscal years of the District, and shall adopt a 19corporate seal and by-laws, which shall determine the times 20for the annual election of officers and of other regular and 21special meetings of the board and shall contain the rules for 22the transaction of other business of the District and for 23amending such by-laws.  HB1123- 2 -LRB104 03406 RTM 13428 b1    Each director of any such District shall devote such time 2to the duties of such office as the faithful discharge thereof 3may require and shall serve without compensation. However, 4each director of such a District may be reimbursed for 5reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the director's 6duties.7(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3716.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.